New York, session 2025-2026, A7179.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-y 2 to read as follows: 3 § 837-y. Collective bargaining agreement. Within thirty days of the 4 effective date of this section, and annually thereafter, every law 5 enforcement agency and political subdivision shall make publicly avail- 6 able any law enforcement collective bargaining agreement such agency or 7 subdivision is subject to, including any collective bargaining agreement 8 negotiated before the adoption of this section, that is in effect upon 9 the effective date of this section. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 11 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11023-01-5